Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2673.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 425, O.S.L.
2024 (74 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 2294.1), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 2294.1. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a
revolving fund for the Oklahoma Historical Society, to be designated
the "Oklahoma Museum of Popular Culture Supplemental Revolving
Fund". The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal
year limitations, and shall consist of all monies received by the
Oklahoma Historical Society from appropriations of the Legislature
designated for deposit in this fund. All monies accruing to the
credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and shall be budgeted and
expended to provide funding for repairs, planning, staging,
refurbishments, and improvements to real and personal property, and
funding for construction of the Oklahoma Museum of Popular Culture.
No expenditures shall be made from the fund until the State
Treasurer determines that funds provided by local and county
governments, the federal government, or through monetary donations
or enforceable pledges for monetary donations in the amount of
Eighteen Million Dollars ($18,000,000.00) are made for repairs,

planning, staging, refurbishments, and improvements to real and
personal property, and funding for construction of the Oklahoma
Museum of Popular Culture; provided, no funds collected or received
prior to May 25, 2023 May 25, 2021, shall be counted toward the
amount. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants
issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by
law with the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services for approval and payment. On November 15, 2025, if no
determination is made by the State Treasurer pursuant to the
provisions of this section authorizing expenditures from this fund,
all unencumbered funds remaining in the Oklahoma Museum of Popular
Culture Supplemental Revolving Fund shall be transferred to the
State Treasurer for deposit in the General Revenue Fund of the State
Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2673 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 27th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 8th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2673 Page 3